incubator/apertium-hi.hi_WX.dix
    <pardef n="h/o__v">
      <e><p><l>okara</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:any"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>o</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:any"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oUz</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>o</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oie</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oiye</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>o</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oyeM</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oez</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>o</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oie</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oiye</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oyeM</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oez</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>onA</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>one</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>onI</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>onIM</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>owA</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:wA"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>owe</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:wA"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>owI</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:wA"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>owIM</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:wA"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uA</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ue</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uye</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uI</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uyI</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uIM</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uyIM</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oUzgA</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ogA</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oiyegA</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oiegA</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ogA</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oMge</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oge</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oiyegA</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oiegA</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oMge</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oUzgI</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ogI</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oiyegA</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oiegA</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ogI</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oMgI</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ogI</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oiyegA</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oiegA</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oMgI</l><r>o<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="ho"><i>h</i><par n="h/o__v"/></e>
